Hawaii, session 2026, SB2123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the emergence of farm dwellings on agricultural park lots has contributed to community complaints regarding dust, noise pollution, and other nuisances arising from the residential use of farm dwellings.  In particular, concerns raised about residential activity on Maui agricultural park lots continue to burden existing farmers and ranchers. The purpose of this Act is to prohibit: (1)  Any person from residing, living, dwelling, or sleeping on any agricultural park lot unless within a farm dwelling that is permitted by the board of agriculture and biosecurity after the board conducts a thorough review of the proposed use; and (2)  The construction of new farm dwellings on any agricultural park lot. SECTION 2. Chapter 166, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§166-    Farm dwellings; prohibited.  No person shall reside, live, dwell, or sleep on any agricultural park lot, except within a farm dwelling permitted by the board after a thorough and comprehensive review that includes input from adjacent landowners and lessees; provided that the board's review shall include an evaluation of whether there are appropriate buffer zones in place to address dust, noise pollution, and other nuisances that may arise from the proposed use of the farm dwelling." SECTION 3. During fiscal year 2026-2027, the department of agriculture and biosecurity may inspect each agricultural park lot for unpermitted farm dwellings.  If an unpermitted farm dwelling is found, the information shall be referred to the board of agriculture and biosecurity. SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________